Tennessee statutes. Title 61 Partnerships
Part 2

Certificate of Limited Partnership

61-2-201. Execution and filing of certificate of limited partnership.

In order to form a limited partnership, one (1) or more persons, but not less than all of the general partners, must execute a certificate of limited partnership. A certificate of limited partnership must be filed with the secretary of state, in the manner and form prescribed by the secretary of state, and set forth:

The name of the limited partnership;

The street address and zip code of the limited partnership's initial registered office, the county in which the office is located, and the name of its initial registered agent at that office as required to be maintained by § 61-2-104;

The street address and zip code of the principal office of the limited partnership, and a mailing address such as a post office box if the United States postal service does not deliver to the principal office;

The name and the business, residence, or mailing address of each general partner;

Any other matters not inconsistent with the partnership agreement that the partners determined to include; and

Any additional information required by the secretary of state.

The partnership agreement shall not be filed.

A limited partnership is formed at the time of the filing of the initial certificate of limited partnership with the secretary of state or at any later date or time specified in the certificate of limited partnership if, in either case, there has been substantial compliance with the requirements of this section. A limited partnership shall have a term of fifty (50) years unless the certificate of limited partnership provides otherwise.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 1989, ch. 270, § 10; 1997, ch. 38, § 1; 2014, ch. 783, § 22; 2020, ch. 719, § 27.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, in the second sentence of the introductory paragraph in (a), substituted “must” for “shall”, and inserted “, in the manner and form prescribed by the secretary of state"; deleted the parentheses before “and a mailing” and after “principle office” in (a)(3); deleted “and” at the end of (a)(4); in (a)(5), substituted “that” for “which” and “include; and” for “include therein;”; and added (a)(6).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 719, § 35. June 22, 2020.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Partnership, § 3.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 6-401.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act (Glenn Stophel and James C. Heartfield), 26 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 22 (1990).

Attorney General Opinions. Taxation of interest in limited partnership, OAG 89-75, 1989 Tenn. AG LEXIS 57 (5/4/89).

61-2-202. Amendment generally.

A certificate of limited partnership is amended by filing a certificate of amendment thereto with the secretary of state. A certificate of amendment shall set forth:

The name of the limited partnership; and

The amendment to the certificate.

A general partner who becomes aware that any statement in a certificate of limited partnership was false when made, or that any matter described in a certificate of limited partnership has changed, making the certificate false in any material respect, shall promptly amend the certificate.

Notwithstanding the requirements of subsection (b), no later than sixty (60) days after the happening of any of the following events, an amendment to a certificate of limited partnership reflecting the occurrence of the event or events shall be filed by a general partner:

The admission of a new general partner;

The withdrawal of a general partner; or

A change in the name of the limited partnership or a change in the address of the limited partnership's principal office.

A change in the address of the registered office or a change in the name of the registered agent of the limited partnership can be made by filing a certificate of amendment pursuant to this section or by filing a statement of change pursuant to § 61-2-104(b) and (c). The change must be filed no later than sixty (60) days after the registered office or registered agent changes.

A certificate of limited partnership may be amended at any time for any other proper purpose that the general partners may determine.

Unless otherwise provided in this chapter or in the certificate of amendment, a certificate of amendment shall be effective at the time of its filing with the secretary of state.

If, after the dissolution of a limited partnership, but prior to the filing of a certificate of cancellation as provided in § 61-2-203:

A certificate of limited partnership has been amended to reflect the withdrawal of all general partners of a limited partnership, the certificate of limited partnership shall be amended to set forth the name and the business, residence or mailing address of each person winding up the limited partnership's affairs, each of whom shall execute and file such certificate of amendment, and each of whom shall not be subject to liability as a general partner by reason of such amendment; or

A person shown on a certificate of limited partnership as a general partner is not winding up the limited partnership's affairs, the certificate of limited partnership shall be amended to add the name and the business, residence or mailing address of each person winding up the limited partnership's affairs, each of whom shall execute and file such certificate of amendment, and each of whom shall not be subject to liability as a general partner by reason of such amendment.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 1989, ch. 270, §§ 11, 12.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 6-402, 6-1001.

61-2-203. Cancellation generally — Continuation of limited partnership after cancellation of certificate.

A certificate of limited partnership shall be cancelled upon the dissolution and the completion of winding up of the limited partnership or at any other time there are no limited partners.

A certificate of cancellation shall be filed with the secretary of state and set forth:

The name of the limited partnership;

The date of filing of its certificate of limited partnership;

The reason for filing the certificate of cancellation;

The future effective date or time (which shall be a date or time certain) of cancellation if it is not to be effective upon the filing of the certificate; and

Any other information which the person filing the certificate of cancellation determines necessary to include.

The secretary of state shall file the certificate of cancellation if the secretary of state finds that the certificate of cancellation:

Complies with subsection (b); and

Is accompanied by a tax clearance for termination or withdrawal relative to such limited partnership; provided, however, that a confirmation of good standing shall be required in lieu of the tax clearance for termination or withdrawal if the limited partnership indicates in the certificate of cancellation that the limited partnership is converting to another entity type.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 1989, ch. 270, § 13; 1999, ch. 363, § 1; 2009, ch. 354, § 2; 2010, ch. 741, § 53.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 6-1001.

61-2-204. Execution generally.

Each certificate required by this part to be filed with the secretary of state shall be executed in the following manner:

An initial certificate of limited partnership must be signed by all general partners;

A certificate of amendment must be signed by at least one (1) general partner and by each other general partner designated in the certificate of amendment as a new general partner, but if the certificate of amendment reflects the withdrawal of a general partner as a general partner, it need not be signed by that former general partner;

A certificate of cancellation must be signed by all general partners or, if the general partners are not winding up the limited partnership's affairs, then by all liquidating trustees; provided, however, that if the limited partners are winding up the limited partnership's affairs, a certificate of cancellation need be signed only by a majority of the limited partners;

If a domestic limited partnership is filing a certificate of merger, the certificate of merger must be signed by at least one (1) general partner of the domestic limited partnership, or if the certificate of merger is being filed by an other business entity (as defined in § 61-2-211(a)), the certificate of merger must be signed by a person authorized by such other business entity; and

All other certificates must be signed by at least one (1) general partner.

Unless otherwise provided in the partnership agreement, any person may sign any certificate or amendment thereof or enter into a partnership agreement or amendment thereof by an agent, including an attorney-in-fact. An authorization, including a power of attorney, to sign any certificate or amendment thereof or to enter into a partnership agreement or amendment thereof must be in writing, but need not be sworn to, verified or acknowledged, and need not be filed in the office of the secretary of state, but if in writing, must be retained by a general partner.

The execution of a certificate by a general partner constitutes an oath or affirmation, under the penalties of perjury, that, to the best of the general partner's knowledge and belief, the facts stated therein are true.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 1989, ch. 270, §§ 14-18; 2011, ch. 99, § 20.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 6-1001.

61-2-205. Execution, amendment, or cancellation by court order.

If a person required by § 61-2-204 to execute any certificate fails or refuses to do so, any other person who is adversely affected by the failure or refusal may petition a court of record to direct the execution of the certificate. If the court finds that the execution of the certificate is proper and that any person so designated has failed or refused to execute the certificate, it shall order the secretary of state to record an appropriate certificate.

If a person required to execute a partnership agreement, amendment or cancellation thereof fails or refuses to do so, any other person who is adversely affected by the failure or refusal may petition the court of record to direct the execution of the partnership agreement, amendment or cancellation thereof. If the court finds that the partnership agreement, amendment or cancellation thereof should be executed and that any person so designated has failed or refused to do so, it shall enter an order granting appropriate relief.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1.

61-2-206. Filing — Recording — Fee.

The original signed copy of the certificate of limited partnership and of any certificate of amendment or cancellation (or of any judicial decree of amendment or cancellation) and of any certificate of merger or consolidation and of any restated certificate shall be filed with the secretary of state in accordance with part 11 of this chapter.

Each certificate required by this part to be filed with the secretary of state shall also be recorded in the office of the register of deeds in the county in which the limited partnership is to have its principal office if such principal office is in Tennessee; provided, however, that when such certificate is filed by the secretary of state, the matters covered by such certificate shall be effective as stated therein, and a copy of such certificate certified by the secretary of state shall be conclusive evidence of the matters covered therein. The register of deeds may charge five dollars ($5.00) plus fifty cents (50¢) per page in excess of five (5) pages for such filing.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 1989, ch. 270, §§ 19, 20.

61-2-207. Liability for false statement.

If any certificate of limited partnership or certificate of amendment or cancellation contains a materially false statement, one who suffers loss by reasonable reliance on the statement may recover damages for the loss from:

Any general partner who executes the certificate and knew or should have known the statement to be false in any material respect at the time the certificate was executed; and

Any general partner who thereafter knows that any arrangement or other fact described in the certificate is false in any material respect or has changed, making the statement false in any material respect, if that general partner had sufficient time to amend or cancel the certificate, or to file a petition for its amendment or cancellation, before the statement was reasonably relied upon.

No general partner shall have any liability for failing to cause the amendment or cancellation of a certificate to be filed or failing to file a petition for its amendment or cancellation pursuant to subsection (a) if the certificate of amendment, certificate of cancellation or petition is filed within ninety (90) days of when that general partner knew or should have known that the statement in the certificate was false in any material respect.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1.

61-2-208. Notice.

The fact that a certificate of limited partnership is on file with the secretary of state is notice that the partnership is a limited partnership and is notice of all other facts set forth therein which are required to be set forth in a certificate of limited partnership by § 61-2-201(a)(1)-(4) and by § 61-2-202(g).

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 1989, ch. 270, § 21; 2011, ch. 99, § 21.

61-2-209. Delivery to partners.

Upon the return by the secretary of state pursuant to § 61-2-1106 of a certificate marked “Filed,” the general partners shall promptly deliver or mail a copy of the certificate to each limited partner, if the partnership agreement so requires.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1.

61-2-210. Integration and restatement.

A limited partnership may, whenever desired, integrate into a single instrument all of the provisions of its certificate of limited partnership which are then in effect and operative as a result of there having theretofore been filed with the secretary of state one (1) or more certificates or other instruments pursuant to any of the sections referred to in this part, and it may at the same time also further amend its certificate of limited partnership by adopting a restated certificate of limited partnership.

If the restated certificate of limited partnership merely restates and integrates but does not further amend the initial certificate of limited partnership, as theretofore amended or supplemented by any instrument that was executed and filed pursuant to any of the sections in this part, it shall be designated in its heading as a “Restated Certificate of Limited Partnership” and shall be executed by a general partner, but if the restated certificate reflects the withdrawal of a general partner as a general partner, such restated certificate of limited partnership need not be signed by that former general partner, and shall be filed as required by § 61-2-206 with the secretary of state. If the restated certificate restates and integrates and also further amends in any respect the certificate of limited partnership, as theretofore amended or supplemented, it shall be designated in its heading as an “Amended and Restated Certificate of Limited Partnership” and shall be executed by at least one (1) general partner, and by each other general partner designated in the restated certificate of limited partnership as a new general partner, and filed as required by § 61-2-206 with the secretary of state.

A restated certificate of limited partnership shall state the limited partnership's present name and the date of filing of its original certificate of limited partnership with the secretary of state and the future effective date or time (which shall be a date or time certain), of the restated certificate if it is not to be effective upon the filing of the restated certificate. A restated certificate shall also state that it was duly executed and is being filed in accordance with this section. If the restated certificate only restates and integrates and does not further amend the limited partnership's certificate of limited partnership as theretofore amended or supplemented and there is no discrepancy between those provisions and the restated certificate, it shall state that fact as well. A restated certificate of limited partnership must contain all the information required in the original certificate of limited partnership as set out in § 61-2-201, except that the current instead of the initial registered agent and registered office must be stated.

Upon the filing of the restated certificate of limited partnership with the secretary of state, or upon the future effective date or time of a restated certificate of limited partnership as provided for therein, the initial certificate of limited partnership, as theretofore amended or supplemented, shall be superseded; thenceforth, the restated certificate of limited partnership, including any further amendment or changes made thereby, shall be the certificate of limited partnership of the limited partnership, but the original effective date of formation shall remain unchanged.

Any amendment or change effected in connection with the restatement and integration of the certificate of limited partnership shall be subject to any other provisions of this chapter, not inconsistent with this section, which would apply if a separate certificate of amendment were filed to effect such amendment or change.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 1989, ch. 270, §§ 22, 23.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 6-403, 6-404.

61-2-211. Merger.

As used in this section, “other business entity” means a corporation, limited liability company, business trust or association, a real estate investment trust, a common law trust, or an unincorporated business, including a partnership (whether general or limited, but excluding a domestic limited partnership).

Pursuant to an agreement of merger, a domestic limited partnership may merge with or into one (1) or more domestic limited partnerships or other business entities formed or organized under the laws of this state or any other state or the United States or any foreign country or other foreign jurisdiction, with such domestic limited partnership or other business entity as the agreement shall provide being the surviving or resulting domestic limited partnership or other business entity. Unless otherwise provided in the partnership agreement, a merger shall be approved by each domestic limited partnership which is to merge:

By all general partners; and

By the limited partners or, if there is more than one (1) class or group of limited partners, then by each class or group of limited partners, in either case, by limited partners who own more than fifty percent (50%) of the then current percentage or other interest in the profits of the domestic limited partnership owned by all of the limited partners or by the limited partners in each class or group, as appropriate.

Notwithstanding prior approval, an agreement of merger may be terminated prior to filing of a certificate of merger with the secretary of state or amended pursuant to a provision for such termination or amendment contained in the agreement of merger.

If a domestic limited partnership is merging under this section, the domestic limited partnership or other business entity surviving or resulting in or from the merger shall file a certificate of merger in the office of the secretary of state. The certificate of merger shall state:

The name, jurisdiction and date of formation or organization of each of the domestic limited partnerships or other business entities which is to merge;

That an agreement of merger has been approved and executed by each of the domestic limited partnerships or other business entities which is to merge;

The name of the surviving or resulting domestic limited partnership or other business entity;

The future effective date or time (which shall be a date or time certain and which shall comply with § 61-2-1104(b)) of the merger if it is not to be effective upon the filing of the certificate of merger;

That the agreement of merger is on file at a place of business of the surviving or resulting domestic limited partnership or other business entity, and shall state the address of such entity;

That a copy of the agreement of merger will be furnished by the surviving or resulting domestic limited partnership or other business entity, on request and without cost, to any partner of any domestic limited partnership or any person holding an interest in any other business entity which is to merge; and

If the surviving or resulting entity is not a domestic limited partnership or corporation organized under the laws of this state a statement that such surviving or resulting other business entity agrees that it may be served with process in the state in any action, suit or proceeding for the enforcement of any obligation of any domestic limited partnership which is to merge, irrevocably appointing the secretary of state as its agent to accept service of process in any such action, suit or proceeding and specifying the address to which a copy of such process shall be mailed to it by the secretary of state. In the event of service hereunder upon the secretary of state, the procedures set forth in § 61-2-106 shall be applicable, except that the plaintiff in any such action, suit or proceeding shall furnish the secretary of state with the address specified in the certificate of merger provided for in this section and any other address which the plaintiff may elect to furnish, together with copies of such process as required by the secretary of state, and the secretary of state shall notify such surviving or resulting other business entity at all such addresses furnished by the plaintiff in accordance with the procedures set forth in § 61-2-106.

Unless a future effective date or time pursuant to § 61-2-1104(b) is provided in a certificate of merger, in which event a merger shall be effective at any such future effective date or time, a merger shall be effective upon the filing in the office of the secretary of state of a certificate of merger.

A certificate of merger shall act as a certificate of cancellation for a domestic limited partnership which is not the surviving or resulting entity in the merger.

When any merger has become effective under this section, for all purposes of the laws of the state, all of the rights, privileges and powers of each of the domestic limited partnerships and other business entities that have merged, and all property, real, personal and mixed, and all debts due to any of the domestic limited partnerships and other business entities, as well as all other things and causes of action belonging to each of such domestic limited partnerships and other business entities, shall be vested in the surviving or resulting domestic limited partnership or other business entity, and shall thereafter be the property of the surviving or resulting domestic limited partnership or other business entity as they were of each of the domestic limited partnerships and other business entities that have merged, and the title to any real property vested by deed or otherwise in any of such domestic limited partnerships and other business entities, shall not revert or be in any way impaired by reason of this chapter; but all rights of creditors and all liens upon any property of any of the domestic limited partnerships and other business entities shall be preserved unimpaired, and all debts, liabilities and duties of each of the domestic limited partnerships and other business entities that have merged shall thenceforth attach to the surviving or resulting domestic limited partnership or other business entity, and may be enforced against it to the same extent as if the debts, liabilities and duties had been incurred or contracted by it. Unless otherwise agreed, a merger of a domestic limited partnership, including a domestic limited partnership which is not the surviving or resulting entity in the merger, shall not require such domestic limited partnership to wind up its affairs under § 61-2-803 or pay its liabilities and distribute its assets under § 61-2-804.

Each certificate of merger required by this part to be filed with the secretary of state shall also be recorded in the office of the register of deeds in the county in which the limited partnership is to have its principal office and in each county in which a limited partnership which is a party to such merger had its principal office; provided, that when such certificate is filed by the secretary of state, the matters covered by such certificate shall be effective as stated therein, and a copy of such certificate certified by the secretary of state shall be conclusive evidence of the matters covered therein. The register of deeds may charge five dollars ($5.00) plus fifty cents (50¢) per page in excess of five (5) pages for such filing.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 1989, ch. 270, §§ 24, 25; 1994, ch. 868, § 12.

Cross-References. Limited liability companies, title 48, chs. 201-249.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 6-701.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act (Glenn Stophel and James C. Heartfield), 26 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 22 (1990).